North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 6C. Review of Administrative Rules. [Repealed]

§§ 120-30.24 through 120-30.28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 927, s. 2.

§ 120-30.29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 688, s. 8.

§ 120-30.29A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 927, s. 2.

§§ 120-30.30,
120-30.31.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 688, s. 8.

§ 120-30.32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 927, s. 2.

§ 120-30.33.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 688, s. 8.

§§ 120-30.34 through 120-30.40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 927, s. 2.